West Virginia, session 2025, HB3249.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS. §9-5-34. Authorizing persons convicted of a felony to be employed at behavioral health facilities; limitations; rulemaking. Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, upon completion of his or her criminal sentence, any person convicted of a nonviolent felony is eligible for employment at a behavioral health facility, conditioned on rules promulgated pursuant to this section. The department shall propose rules for legislative approval, in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq., necessary to establish eligibility criteria and provide for any conditions and limitations on employment necessary to provide for the safety of patients and other employees at the facility: Provided, That the provisions of this section do not supersede licensing requirements for any professions regulated pursuant to chapter 30 of this code.